Texas, session 892, HB123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 141.009, Health and Safety Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 141.009.  STANDARDS. The executive commissioner by rule shall establish health and safety standards for youth camps. The standards may relate to: (1)  adequate and proper supervision at all times of camp activities; (2)  qualifications for directors, supervisors, and staff and sufficient numbers of those persons; (3)  proper safeguards for sanitation and public health; (4)  adequate medical services for personal health and first aid; (5)  proper procedures for food preparation, handling, and mass feeding; (6)  healthful and sufficient water supply; (7)  proper waste disposal; (8)  proper water safety procedures for swimming pools, lakes, and waterways; (9)  safe boating equipment; (10)  proper maintenance and safe use of motor vehicles; (11)  safe buildings and physical facilities; (12)  proper fire and flood precautions; (13)  safe and proper recreational and other equipment; (14)  proper regard for density and use of the premises; and (15)  records of criminal convictions of camp personnel. SECTION 2.  Chapter 141, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Sections 141.0091 and 141.0092 to read as follows: Sec. 141.0091.  EMERGENCY SAFETY REQUIREMENTS. (a)  The department may not issue or renew a license for a youth camp under this chapter unless the youth camp operator provides to the department documentation showing the camp: (1)  does not provide overnight accommodations in a camp facility located within a flood plain; (2)  maintains personal flotation devices in each camp facility in which the camp provides overnight accommodations and that is located near a flood-prone area or waterway; (3)  maintains operable radios capable of providing real-time weather alerts in each camp facility in which the camp provides overnight accommodations; (4)  installs and maintains an emergency warning system at the camp that: (A)  is capable of alerting all campers and camp occupants of a flood, fire, or other imminent emergency or hazard; (B)  integrates with: (i)  the National Weather Service or a similar professional weather service; (ii)  local emergency notification systems; and (iii)  local river authorities; (C)  includes a public address system operable without reliance on an Internet connection; (D)  is capable of being manually triggered by camp staff; and (E)  complies with all applicable requirements for an emergency warning system established by department rules or other law; (5)  adopts a written emergency preparedness plan detailing: (A)  evacuation and transportation procedures; (B)  muster points; (C)  the location and proper use of available emergency equipment, including: (i)  items for extinguishing fires; (ii)  beacons; (iii)  flotation devices; and (iv)  any other emergency equipment required by department rules; (D)  protocols for notifying local emergency medical services providers; (E)  information and procedures regarding the camp's emergency warning system; and (F)  active shooter response protocols; (6)  provides the emergency preparedness plan described by Subdivision (5) to and obtains approval from the local agency responsible for providing emergency response services for the camp; (7)  adopts a written policy to provide a weekly notification to the local agency described by Subdivision (6) of the number of campers and other occupants present at the camp for that week; (8)  designates an emergency preparedness supervisor as required by Section 141.0092; (9)  adopts a written policy to provide to each camper and each camper's parent or legal guardian a digital or physical copy of the camp's emergency preparedness plan before each camp session begins; and (10)  conducts: (A)  not less than three evacuation drills each calendar year; (B)  appropriate safety drills during each camp session; and (C)  any other emergency or safety drill required by department rules or other law. (b)  The executive commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section. Sec. 141.0092.  EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS SUPERVISOR. (a)  A youth camp operator shall designate a staff member as the emergency preparedness supervisor for each camp session. (b)  The designated emergency preparedness supervisor is responsible for implementing and providing oversight of the camp's emergency preparedness plan.  The supervisor shall: (1)  conduct required emergency training and drills at the camp; (2)  maintain the camp's emergency equipment; and (3)  ensure the camp is in compliance with Section 141.0091 and rules adopted under that section. (c)  The executive commissioner may adopt rules prescribing qualifications and training required for an individual to be a youth camp's emergency preparedness supervisor. SECTION 3.  As soon as possible after the effective date of this Act, the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement Section 141.009, Health and Safety Code, as amended by this Act, and Sections 141.0091 and 141.0092, Health and Safety Code, as added by this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.